Washington statutes.
RCW 19.09.085

Registration—Duration—Change—Notice to reregister (as amended by 2011 c 183).

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

(1) Registration under this chapter shall be effective for one year or longer, as established by the secretary.

(2) Reregistration required under RCW 19.09.075 or 19.09.079 shall be submitted to the secretary no later than the date established by the secretary by rule.

(3) Entities required to register under this chapter shall file a notice of change of information within thirty days of any change in the information contained in *RCW 19.09.075 (1) through (9) or 19.09.079 (1) through (7).

(4) The secretary shall notify entities registered under this chapter of the need to reregister upon the expiration of their current registration. The notification ((shall)) may be by postal or electronic mail, sent at least sixty days prior to the expiration of their current registration. Failure to register shall not be excused by a failure of the secretary to ((mail)) send the notice or by an entity's failure to receive the notice.

[2011 c 183 s 1; 2007 c 471 s 6; 1993 c 471 s 6; 1986 c 230 s 8; 1983 c 265 s 8.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 19.09.075 was amended by 2011 c 199 s 8, changing the subsection numbering.

PDFRCW 19.09.085

Registration—Duration—Notice to renew—When registered—Incomplete application—Failure to pay filing fee (as amended by 2011 c 199).

*** CHANGE IN 2025 *** (SEE 1281-S.SL) ***

(1) Registration under this chapter ((shall be)) is effective for one year or ((longer,)) as established by the secretary.

(2) ((Reregistration)) Renewals required under RCW 19.09.075 or 19.09.079 ((shall)) must be submitted to the secretary no later than the date established by the secretary by rule.

(3) ((Entities required to register under this chapter shall file a notice of change of information within thirty days of any change in the information contained in RCW 19.09.075 (1) through (9) or 19.09.079 (1) through (7).

(4))) The secretary ((shall)) must notify entities registered under this chapter of the need to ((reregister)) renew upon the expiration of their current registration. The notification ((shall)) must be ((by mail, sent at least)) made approximately sixty days prior to the expiration ((of their current registration)) date and must be made through postal or electronic means. Failure to ((register)) renew shall not be excused by a failure of the secretary to ((mail)) send the notice or by an entity's failure to receive the notice.

(4) Entities required to register and renew under this chapter must file a notice of change of information within thirty days of any change in the information contained in RCW 19.09.075 (1)(a) through (k) or 19.09.079 (1) through (7) and (9).

(5) Entities are deemed registered under RCW 19.09.075 or 19.09.079 no sooner than twenty days after receipt of the registration or renewal form by the secretary and may thereafter solicit contributions from the general public.

(6) If the secretary determines that the application for initial registration or renewal is incomplete, the secretary must notify the applicant of the information necessary to complete the application. The secretary may hold the application up to thirty days to allow the applicant time to provide additional information. If the applicant fails to provide complete information as requested by the secretary, the applicant must be deemed unregistered and must cease all solicitations as defined by this chapter.

(7) If an applicant fails to pay a required fee for any filing, the secretary must notify the applicant of the necessary fee to complete the application. The secretary may hold the application up to thirty days to allow the applicant time to submit the required payment. If the applicant fails to provide the required payment as requested by the secretary, the applicant must be deemed unregistered and must cease all solicitations as defined by this chapter.

[2011 c 199 s 12; 2007 c 471 s 6; 1993 c 471 s 6; 1986 c 230 s 8; 1983 c 265 s 8.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: RCW 19.09.085 was amended twice during the 2011 legislative session, each without reference to the other. For rule of construction concerning sections amended more than once during the same legislative session, see RCW 1.12.025.